District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Rapid Re-Housing Reform Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Homeless Services Reform Act of 2005, effective October 22, 2005 (D.C.
Law 16-35; D.C. Official Code § 4–751.01 et seq.) is amended as follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding section designations for sections 32 and
33 to read as follows:
“Sec. 32. Rapid Re-housing Reform.
“Sec. 33. Targeted Affordable Housing Eligibility and Prioritization.”.
(b) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 4–751.01) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (27C) is amended by striking the phrase “Rapid Re-Housing and
permanent supportive housing.” and inserting the phrase “permanent supportive housing and
targeted affordable housing.” in its place.


(2) By adding a new paragraph (39A) to read as follows:
“(39A) “Targeted affordable housing” means a program that provides rental assistance
for an unrestricted period of time to assist individuals or families experiencing homelessness, or
at-risk of experiencing homelessness, in obtaining and maintaining permanent housing.”.
(c) Section 6(b)(4) (D.C. Official Code § 4–753.01(b)(4)) is amended to read as follows:
“(A) Rapid Re-Housing programs for the purpose of providing housing
relocation and stabilization services and time-limited rental assistance to help a homeless
individual or family move as quickly as possible into permanent housing and achieve stability in
that housing; or
“(B) Targeted affordable housing for the purposes of providing rental
assistance for an unrestricted period of time to assist individuals or families experiencing
homelessness, or at-risk of experiencing homelessness, to obtain and maintain permanent
housing; or
“(C) Permanent supportive housing for the purpose of providing eligible
individuals and families experiencing chronic homelessness or at risk of experiencing chronic
homelessness, with ongoing housing and supportive service.”.
(d) A new section 32 is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 32. Rapid Re-housing Reform.
“(a) An individual or a head of a household shall pay no more than 30% of their income
toward rent while participating in the Rapid Re-Housing Program.
“(b)(1)(A) No later than 6 months after an individual or family is determined to be
eligible for Rapid Re-Housing, the Mayor shall determine whether each individual or family is


eligible for a permanent rental subsidy, including permanent supportive housing and targeted
affordable housing.
“(B) The Department shall share a determination of eligibility with the
individual or family within 5 business days of making a determination.
“(2)(A) For individuals or families already participating in Rapid Re-Housing that
the Department intends to exit from the program pursuant to § 4–754.36b, the Department shall
determine the individual or family’s eligibility for permanent supportive housing or targeted
affordable housing at least 3 months before the proposed exit date.
“(B) The Department shall share a determination of eligibility with the
individual or family within 5 business days of making a determination.
“(3)(A) The Department shall provide individuals or families determined to be
eligible for, or already participating in, Rapid Re-Housing with information on home ownership
programs, including the Home Purchase Assistance Program.
“(B) If an individual or family requests an application for a home
ownership program, the Department shall refer the individual or family to an appropriate
community-based organization within 5 business days
“(3) If an individual or family entering into or participating in Rapid Re-Housing
is determined to be eligible for permanent supportive housing or targeted affordable housing, the
individual or family shall not be exited from Rapid Re-Housing until the family receives a
voucher and is leased up with a housing provider who accepts the voucher; provided, that this
shall not apply to an individual or family who has sufficient income to cover the cost of a rental
unit they have secured in the District. For purposes of this paragraph, an individual or family


does not have sufficient income to cover the cost of a rental unit if more than 30% of the
individual or head of households’ income would be used to pay rent.
“(c) Case management for individuals or families determined to be eligible for or
participating in Rapid Re-Housing shall be voluntary and available upon oral or written request;
provided, that an individual or an individual in a family deemed to be eligible for or participating
in Rapid Re-Housing who receives income through Temporary Assistance to Needy Families
shall not receive case management through Rapid Re-Housing.
(e) A new section 33 is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 33. Targeted Affordable Housing Eligibility and Prioritization.
“(a) Individuals or families who are homeless, at risk of homelessness, or participating in
a Continuum of Care program shall be eligible for targeted affordable housing.
“(b) Individuals or families determined to be eligible for targeted affordable housing shall
be prioritized in the following order:
“(1) Individuals or families who will be exited from the Rapid Re-Housing
program and do not have sufficient income to cover the cost of a market rate rental unit of
appropriate size for the individual or family.
“(2)(A) Individuals or families in Rapid Re-Housing who are not eligible or
prioritized for permanent supportive housing and do not have sufficient income to cover the cost
of a rental unit of appropriate size for the participant or participant family.
“(B) Individuals or families in this category should be prioritized based on
the length of time that the participant has been in Rapid Re-Housing, with individuals or families
100 who have been in the program longer selected first.


101 “(3) Emergency shelter residents who have previously participated in Rapid Re-
102 housing but are not eligible or prioritized for permanent supportive housing and do not have
103 sufficient income to cover the cost of a rental unit of appropriate size for the individual
104 participant or participant family; and
105 “(4) All other eligible applicants.
106 “(c)(1) The Department shall accept applications for targeted affordable housing from
107 any participant in a Continuum of Care program in the form of oral or written request for
108 consideration.
109 “(2) The Department shall document any written or oral requests for targeted
110 affordable housing in the participant’s file.
111 “(d) The Department shall provide timely written notice of eligibility pursuant to § 4-
112 754.33.
113 “(e) Individuals or families shall have the opportunity to appeal adverse action decisions
114 pursuant to § 4-753.41 and § 4-753.42.
115 “(f) For purposes of subsection (b) and (c) of this section, Continuum of Care
116 participants, including emergency shelter residents and individuals and families in Rapid Re-
117 Rehousing, do not have sufficient income to cover the cost of a rental unit if more than 30% of
118 the individual or head of household’s income would be used to pay rent.”.
119 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
120 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
121 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
122 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
123 Sec. 4. Effective date.


124 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
125 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
126 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
127 24, 1973, (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
128 Columbia Register.